New Jersey, session 221, A1844.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a child care center licensed pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1983, c.492 (C.30:5B-1 et seq.) shall prepare and make available a notice of 1[any] a1 change in the tuition rate charged by the center1[, 60 days prior to the change,]1 to every parent or legal guardian of a child attending the center 1, if the center proposes to increase or decrease the tuition rate by four percent1.  The notice shall be sent 1[by certified mail, return receipt requested or] , 60 days prior to the tuition rate change,1 by receipted first class mail addressed to the parent or legal guardian at the last known address identified in the child care centers records, or shall be delivered in person to the parent or legal guardian by a staff member of the center.  The notice shall be posted on the child care centers internet website or by other electronic means, and shall be displayed in a prominent location within the center. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to any changes in the tuition rate charged by a licensed child care center occurring on or after the first day of the third month next following the date of enactment.